Maryland, session 2025, SB0878.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
14–107.1.
(a) In this section, “hydraulic fracturing” means a stimulation treatment
performed on oil and natural gas wells in low–permeability oil or natural gas reservoirs
through which specially engineered fluids are pumped at high pressure and rate into the
reservoir interval to be treated, causing fractures to open.
(b) A person may [not] engage in the hydraulic fracturing of a well for the
exploration or production of oil or natural gas in the State.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0878*

SENATE BILL 878
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.